Nebraska, session 109, LB1105.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1105 LB1105
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $XXXX from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $XXXX from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to
XXX, Program XXX.
There is included in the appropriation to this program $XXX for
FY2025-26 for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There
is included in the appropriation to this program $XXX for FY2026-27 for
state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-